Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2348.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "customer-generator" and "net metering" in section 2 of the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718192021 "Abandoned mine land." An area of land no longer in use that, in connection with extracting a natural resource from its natural deposits in the earth by any means, has had material placed upon, under or above the surface."Agricultural operations." As defined in 3 Pa.C.S. § 503 (relating to definitions).* * *"Avoided cost." The average locational marginal price of energy, capacity and transmission and distribution grid services values, as determined by the commission, in the applicable transmission zone over the customer-generator's billing period."Brownfield." A property that the expansion, redevelopment or reuse of which may be complicated by the presence or potential presence of a hazardous substance, pollutant or contaminant."Capped landfill." A capped facility for disposal of trash or garbage in which waste is buried between layers of earth and covered by a cap."Commercial rooftop." A roof located on a building or group of buildings used primarily for indoor storage, transfer, manufacture, assembly and distribution or sale of products, services and materials.* * *"Customer-generator." A [nonutility owner or operator of a net metered distributed generation system with] retail electric customer that owns and operates, leases or operates or contracts with a third party that owns or operates an alternative energy system that has a nameplate capacity of not greater than 50 kilowatts if installed at a residential service or not larger than 3,000 kilowatts at other customer service locations, except 20260HB2348PN3139 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for customers whose systems are above three megawatts and up to five megawatts who make their systems available to operate in parallel with the electric utility during grid emergencies as defined by the regional transmission organization or where a microgrid is in place for the primary or secondary purpose of maintaining critical infrastructure, such as homeland security assignments, emergency services facilities, hospitals, traffic signals, wastewater treatment plants or telecommunications facilities, provided that technical rules for operating generators interconnected with facilities of an electric distribution company, electric cooperative or municipal electric system have been promulgated by the Institute of Electrical and Electronic Engineers and the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission.* * *"Full retail value." The value of electric energy credited to a customer-generator at the retail rate, including the generation, capacity, transmission and distribution components of the electric distribution company's approved tariff."Industrial land." Land planned and zoned for industrial use. The term includes land used for manufacturing, assembly, fabrication, processing, storage, logistics, warehousing, importation, distribution, transshipment or research and development."Large customer-generator." A customer-generator with a nameplate capacity greater than 50 kilowatts but not greater than 3,000 kilowatts at nonresidential service locations. Except for existing systems and applications provided under section 5(e), the following apply:(1) A large customer-generator m ust have electric load, 20260HB2348PN3139 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 independent of the alternative energy system, behind the meter and the point of interconnection of the alternative energy system. To be independent of the alternative energy system, the electric load must have a purpose other than to support operation, maintenance or administration of the alternative energy system. This paragraph shall not apply to alternative energy systems under section 5(c).(2) The alternative energy system shall be sized to generate no more than 200% of the large customer-generator's annual electric consumption at the interconnection meter location when combined with all qualifying virtual meter aggregation locations as of the date of the interconnection application. The following shall apply:(i) For existing service location accounts on the effective date of this subparagraph, annual electric consumption shall be based on the highest electric usage from any 12 consecutive-month period within 24 months before submission of the interconnection application. (ii) For new service location accounts, annual electric consumption shall be based on the building type and size and the anticipated usage of electric equipment and fixtures planned for the new service location, as well as the customer's annual consumption from dependent accounts to be included for virtual meter aggregation.(iii) This paragraph shall not apply to alternative energy systems under section 5(c).(3) Excess generation shall be subject to an annual net-metered accounting period, and compensation to the large customer-generator for any remaining excess generation shall be in accordance with section 5.20260HB2348PN3139 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Net metering." The means of measuring the difference between the electricity supplied by an electric utility and the electricity generated by a customer-generator when any portion of the electricity generated by the alternative energy generating system is used to offset part or all of the customer-generator's requirements for electricity. Virtual meter aggregation on properties owned or leased and operated by a customer-generator [and located within two miles of the boundaries of the customer-generator's property and] within a single electric distribution company's service territory shall be eligible for net metering. All service locations to be aggregated must be metered electric utility service location retail customer accounts, held by the same individual, legal entity or parent corporation."Parking facility canopy." A structure constructed over a public or private parking lot."Preferred site." A location determined by the commission to qualify based on whether a majority of the facility's generating capacity or physical footprint is located on one or more of the following:(1) A brownfield. (2) An abandoned mine land. (3) A capped landfill. (4) A parking facility canopy. (5) A site on or adjacent to coal-fired electric generation plants that have closed or will close within one year of the effective date of this definition.(6) A school facility. (7) Industrial land. 20260HB2348PN3139 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) Land with ongoing agricultural operations, if the facility's generating capacity is sourced from biologically derived methane gas.* * *"Routine maintenance." The repair or replacement of equipment necessary to maintain safe and reliable operation of the system, including inverters, wiring transformers, combiner boxes and monitoring equipment, if the action does not increase the nameplate capacity of the system or materially alter system design."School facility." An educational building and surrounding premises owned by any of the following:(1) A school entity as defined in the act of March 10, 1 949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, including any of the following:(i) A school district. (ii) An intermediate unit. (iii) An area career and technical school. (iv) A charter school. (v) A cyber charter school. (vi) A regional charter school. (2) A charter school for the education of the deaf or the blind.(3) A nonpublic school recognized by the Department of Education.(4) A community college. (5) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology. (6) The Pennsylvania College of Technology. "Small customer-generator." A customer-generator with a nameplate capacity of not larger than 50 kilowatts at a 20260HB2348PN3139 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 residential or other customer service location.* * *"Virtual meter aggregation." The combination of readings and billing for meters, regardless of rate class, on properties owned or leased and operated by a customer-generator by means of the electric distribution company's billing process rather than through physical rewiring of the customer-generator's property for a single physical point of contact. Virtual meter aggregation on properties owned or leased by the same customer-generator or alternative energy system operator and within a single electric distribution company's service territory shall be eligible for net metering. Service locations of dependent accounts to be aggregated must be electric distribution company service location accounts, held by a customer receiving retail electric service from the same electric distribution company. The location of an alternative energy system that serves virtual meter aggregation service locations of dependent accounts shall not be required to have measurable electric load independent of the alternative energy system. "Warehouse rooftop." A roof located on a distribution facility, storage facility, fulfillment center, logistics facility or other facility engaged in similar uses. Section 2. Section 5 of the act is amended to read:Section 5. Interconnection standards for customer-generator facilities.(a) Compensation for small customer-generator systems.-- Excess generation from [net-metered] small customer-generators shall receive full retail value for all energy produced on an annual basis.(b) Compensation for large customer-generator systems.-- 20260HB2348PN3139 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Excess generation from large customer-generators shall receive the value of the avoided cost for all energy produced on an annual basis.(c) Warehouse or commercial rooftop net metering systems.-- Notwithstanding subsection (b), excess generation from a net-metered alternative energy system located on a warehouse rooftop or commercial rooftop shall receive full retail value under the electric distribution company's small general service or small commercial rate schedule for all energy produced on an annual basis. The following shall apply:(1) Eligibility for a large customer-generator to receive the full retail value for excess generation under this subsection shall be determined by the commission based on a majority of the facility's generating capacity or physical footprint being located on a warehouse rooftop or commercial rooftop.(2) Excess generation from virtual meter aggregation projects that are constructed on a warehouse rooftop or commercial rooftop and that commence operation after the effective date of this paragraph shall receive full retail value at the applicable rate schedule of the dependent accounts for all energy produced on a monthly basis.(3) An alternative energy system under this subsection that serves virtual meter aggregation service locations of dependent accounts shall not be required to have measurable electric load independent of the alternative energy system.(d) Technical rules.--The commission shall develop technical and net metering interconnection rules for customer-generators intending to operate renewable onsite generators in parallel with the electric utility grid, consistent with rules defined in 20260HB2348PN3139 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other states within the service region of the regional transmission organization that manages the transmission system in any part of this Commonwealth. The commission shall convene a stakeholder process to develop Statewide technical and net metering rules for customer-generators. The commission shall develop these rules within nine months of the effective date of this act.(e) Safe-harbored net metering for existing systems and applications of large customer-generators.--(1) Excess generation from net-metered large customer- generators in operation as of the effective date of this paragraph, or that have submitted an interconnection application to an electric distribution company before September 1, 2025, shall receive full retail value under the electric distribution company's small general service or small commercial rate schedule for all energy produced on an annual basis until the earlier of:(i) replacement of generation equipment that extends the life of the system or changes the nameplate generating capacity, except when the large customer-generator is actively working to recommence production after routine maintenance or a vis major event; or (ii) December 31, 2050. (2) After the applicable time period specified under paragraph (1), excess generation shall be subject to an annual net metered accounting period, and compensation to the large customer-generator for any remaining excess generation shall be capped at the avoided cost. (3) A large customer-generator shall be responsible for interconnection costs and distribution system upgrades 20260HB2348PN3139 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related to the interconnection of the large customer-generator's facility in accordance with the commission's regulations.(4) The commission, in collaboration with the Office of Consumer Advocate, electric distribution companies and solar energy organizations, may establish, by order, a cap on the total megawatts of customer-generators that are eligible for safe harbor under this subsection. A cap established under this paragraph may not exceed a defined percentage of each electric distribution company's default service peak load. The commission shall establish a wait list for net-metered large customer-generators with an interconnection application submitted to an electric distribution company, as specified under paragraph (1), until it determines the cap on the total megawatts of large-customer generators that are eligible for safe harbor under this section. A net-metered large customer-generator that has an interconnection agreement with an electric distribution company that was executed before the effective date of this paragraph, qualifies for safe harbor under this subsection and may not be excluded by a cap established under this paragraph.(f) Preferred site virtual meter aggregation projects.-- (1) Notwithstanding subsection (b) or (e), excess generation from virtual meter aggregation projects that are constructed on a preferred site and that commence operation after the effective date of this paragraph shall receive full retail value at the applicable rate schedule of the dependent accounts for all energy produced on a monthly basis until the earlier of:(i) replacement of generation equipment that extends 20260HB2348PN3139 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the life of the system or changes the nameplate generating capacity, except when the customer-generator is actively working to recommence production after routine maintenance or a vis major event; or(ii) December 31, 2050, if the project is constructed primarily on a preferred site, as determined by the commission based on a majority of the facility's generating capacity or physical footprint.(2) A preferred-site alternative energy system that serves virtual meter aggregation service locations of dependent accounts shall not be required to have measurable electric load independent of the alternative energy system.(3) After the applicable time period specified under paragraph (1), excess generation shall be subject to an annual net metered accounting period, and compensation to the customer-generator for any remaining excess generation shall be capped at the avoided cost.(g) Rate schedule classification.--The installation of a net metered facility or the participation in virtual meter aggregation shall not constitute grounds for reclassification of the customer-generator's applicable rate schedule.Section 3. Section 7 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 7. Interagency responsibilities.* * *(d) Enforcement of provisions.--The commission shall have authority to enforce this act in accordance with the commission's regulations and orders. The commission may issue, modify or rescind a regulation or order to enforce this act, whether issued before or after the effective date of this 20260HB2348PN3139 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit authority granted to the commission under 66 Pa.C.S . (relating to public utilities).Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2348PN3139 - 12 - 1234